District of Columbia statutes.
34-1121

Examination and test of appliances.

The Commission shall provide for the examination and testing of any and all appliances used for the measuring of any product or service of a public utility. Any consumer or user may have any such appliance tested upon payment of the fees fixed by the Commission. The Commission shall declare and establish reasonable fees to be paid for testing such appliances on the request of the consumers or users, the fee to be paid by the consumer or user at the time of his request, but to be paid by the public utility and repaid to the consumer or user if the appliance be found defective or incorrect to the disadvantage of the consumer or user.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 980, ch. 150, § 8, par. 22

History

1981 Ed., § 43-521.
1973 Ed., § 43-321.

Prior Codifications